California statutes. Education Code
(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 41020 or subdivision (m) of Section 47605, for audit reports for the 2019–20 fiscal year, a local educational agency shall file an annual audit report with the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the local educational agency is
 located, the Superintendent, the Controller, and, if applicable, to its chartering authority, by March 31, 2021, and notwithstanding subdivision (k) of Section 41020, the county superintendent of schools shall submit the required certification to the Superintendent and the Controller by July 15, 2021.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (k) of Section 41020, for audit reports for the 2018–19 fiscal year, a county superintendent of schools shall submit the required certification to the Superintendent and the Controller by July 15, 2020.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 41344, for audits certified by the Controller between March 1, 2020, and July 15, 2020, inclusive, a local educational agency may appeal a finding contained in a final audit report within 120 days of the
 date on which the local educational agency receives the final audit report resulting from an audit or review, or within 30 days of receiving a determination of a summary review pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 41344.1, for audits certified between March 1, 2020, and July 15, 2020, inclusive, a local educational agency may request a summary review within 90 days of the date on which the local educational agency receives the final audit report resulting from an audit or review.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 18.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

41021.

The governing board of every school district shall require each employee of the district, whose duty it is to handle funds of the district, and may, in its discretion, require employees of the district, whose duty it is to handle property of the district, to be bonded under a suitable bond indemnifying the district against loss. Such bond may be a name schedule bond, schedule position bond or blanket bond, and shall be in such amount and type as the board shall consider necessary and desirable. The boards shall pay from the funds of the district the cost of the premium necessary to provide the bond.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41022.

Except as provided in this section, any election held for the purpose permitting a school district to exceed the expenditure of school district funds fixed by the Constitution or by the statutes of the state shall be called, held, and conducted as nearly as possible as are elections for the issuance of school district bonds.

The notice of election shall contain only the following:

(a) The time and place or places of holding the election.

(b) The names of the officers appointed to conduct the election.

(c) The hours during the day in which the polls will be open.

(d) The amount by which it is proposed to increase the expenditures of the district during the school year.

(e) The total amount of proposed expenditures of the district, including the proposed increase, for the school year.

The ballots used at the election shall contain the following language: “Shall the total authorized expenditures of the district be increased from ____ (naming the sum) to ____ (naming the sum) for the school year ____ (naming the school year)?”

The hours during which the polls at the election are open shall be fixed in accordance with Section 14212 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41023.

(a) Any agency organized pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the parties of which consist solely of school districts and county offices of education, shall be subject to the same restrictions as are applicable to school districts and county offices of education, under that chapter, including the preparation of budget and financial statements required by Article 1 (commencing with Section 42100) and this article; the certifications required by Article 3 (commencing with Section 42130) of Chapter 6 of Part 24; the accounting and auditing requirements prescribed by Article 1 (commencing with Section 42100) and this article; and the expenditure and appropriation controls prescribed by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 42600) of Part 24. This section does not apply to joint powers agreements that are for the performance of the powers described in Section 17567.

(b) Each agency described in subdivision (a) shall annually report to their participating school districts and county superintendents of schools on forms prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 10.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

41024.

(a) (1) Commencing April 1, 2017, a local educational agency that receives any funds pursuant to the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1) shall annually report a detailed list of all expenditures of state funds, including interest, and of the local educational agency’s matching funds for completed projects until all state funds, including interest, all of the local educational agency’s matching funds, and savings achieved, including interest, pursuant to Section 17070.63, are expended in accordance with the requirements of the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998, associated regulations, and any accompanying grant agreement signed by a local educational agency. A local educational agency’s detailed list of
 expenditures shall identify expenditures on a project-by-project basis, reflect completed projects that were reimbursed within that fiscal year, and shall clearly indicate the list of projects that have been completed.

(2) For purposes of this section, the determination that a project is complete shall be in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1).

(3) The total amount of interest earned on the state funds shall be reported on the final expenditure report upon completion of a project. For the purposes of determining the total amount of interest earned on the state funds, interest shall be considered to accrue from the time state funds are deposited in the local educational agency’s account until the time the local educational agency
 submits the final expenditure report to the Office of Public School Construction.

(4) Commencing April 1, 2017, a local educational agency participating in the school facilities program shall ensure that it retains all financial accounts, documents, and records necessary for an audit of completed projects pursuant to Section 16026 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. For purposes of this paragraph and in compliance with any applicable state and federal standards, a local educational agency may maintain records electronically.

(5) Any project identified on a local educational agency’s detailed list of expenditures pursuant to paragraph (1) that is reported complete during the 2017–18 fiscal year shall be audited in accordance with the audit guide required by Section 14502.1 for the 2018–19 fiscal year. All other completed projects shall be audited in accordance with
 the audit guide required by Section 14502.1 for the fiscal year in which the project is reported complete.

(6) The audit described in this section shall be completed within one year of project completion as determined by Section 1859.104 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) (1) Commencing with audits of the 2018–19 fiscal year, the Controller shall include instructions in the audit guide required by Section 14502.1 that include, but are not necessarily limited to, procedures for determining all of the following:

(A) Whether funds identified by a local educational agency on its detailed list of expenditures pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) have been expended in accordance with the requirements of the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5
 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1), associated regulations, and any accompanying grant agreement signed by a local educational agency. Any funds not expended in accordance with these requirements shall be disallowed and considered an audit finding.

(B) That savings achieved, including interest, pursuant to Section 17070.63, are used for other high priority capital outlay purposes identified by the local educational agency or returned to the Office of Public School Construction, and are used in accordance with the requirements of the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1), associated regulations, and as specified in any accompanying grant agreement.

(C) Adjustments to the grant amounts received by a local educational agency for site acquisition costs
 based upon the local educational agency’s final approved expenditures as required pursuant to Sections 1859.105 and 1859.106 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.

(D) Adjustments to the grant amounts received by a local educational agency associated with the substantial progress requirements reflected in the program reporting requirements pursuant to Section 1859.104 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Any amounts or adjustments identified pursuant to subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (1) shall be identified within a local educational agency’s audit, but shall not be considered an audit finding for purposes of this section.

(c) (1) The auditor conducting the audit pursuant to this section shall file the audit with the Controller within 60 days of the completion
 of the audit. The Controller shall be allowed access to audit working papers. Adjustments pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall not be appealable to the Education Audit Appeals Panel pursuant to this section.

(2) Within 60 days of the receipt of the certified audit, and after determining that the audit conforms with the reporting standards contained in the audit guide, the Controller shall do both of the following:

(A) Provide the department a copy of the certified audit.

(B) Notify the Office of Public School Construction of any audit findings pursuant to this section and any amounts or adjustments identified pursuant to clause (iii) and provide the Office of Public School Construction with a copy of the certified audit identifying the amounts to be adjusted if, as a result of the audit conducted in
 accordance with the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), the auditor determines any of the following:

(i) A local educational agency has unspent funds for the project not identified as savings pursuant to Section 17070.63 that shall be returned pursuant to subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), and any accompanying grant agreement signed by a local educational agency.

(ii) A local educational agency is subject to an increase or decrease in funds provided pursuant to subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), and any accompanying grant agreement signed by a local educational agency.

(iii) A local educational agency did not expend funds in accordance with the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of
 Division 1 of Title 1) and any accompanying grant agreement signed by a local educational agency.

(3) Upon receipt of the certified audit, the Office of Public School Construction shall present any grant adjustments required pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) for a specified project to the State Allocation Board for an adjustment to the project apportionment. Funds identified for purposes of clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall be apportioned from, or returned to, the appropriate funds, as established in the State Treasury pursuant to Section 17070.40 or 17070.41, as applicable. If a school district is required to return unspent funds, the fund source for returned funds shall be the county school facilities fund established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17070.43.

(4) A local educational agency may appeal the
 audit finding pursuant to the timelines and process established in subdivision (d) of Section 41344. The procedures set out in subdivision (d) of Section 41344.1 do not apply to the audit required by this section.

(5) The Office of Public School Construction shall ensure that the local educational agency has corrected the audit finding by implementing a required penalty payment of funds equal to the amount of funds disallowed in the audit finding pursuant to the process specified in subdivision (d).

(d) (1) If, as the result of the audit, a local educational agency is required to pay funds pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), the Office of Public School Construction shall recover the funds from the local educational agency.

(2) If the local
 educational agency has submitted an appeal to the Education Audit Appeals Panel pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 41344, the Office of Public School Construction shall not recover funds until following the determination of the appeal.

(3) A local educational agency may use any local fund source to pay the disallowed amount pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) so long as there is no legal prohibition regarding the use of those funds for this purpose.

(4) A local educational agency may request from the Office of Public School Construction a repayment plan within 90 days of receiving the final audit report, or within 30 days of withdrawing or receiving a final determination regarding an appeal pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 41344 and subdivision (b) of Section 41344.1, as applicable. The Office of Public School Construction and
 the Director of Finance, or their designees, jointly shall establish a plan for payment. The payment plan shall be established in accordance with the following:

(A) If the executive officer of the Office of Public School Construction and the Director of Finance, in consultation with the department, concur that repayment of the disallowed amount in the current fiscal year would constitute a severe financial hardship for the local educational agency, they may jointly approve a plan of equal annual payments over a period of up to eight years. The plan may include interest on each year’s outstanding balance at the rate earned on the state’s Pooled Money Investment Account during that year. The executive officer of the Office of Public School Construction and the Director of Finance jointly shall establish this plan. At the time the local educational agency is notified, the Controller also shall be notified of the plan by the executive officer of
 the Office of Public School Construction. The Controller shall withhold the annual amount established pursuant to the plan from the local educational agency’s principal apportionment or Education Protection Account payments.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), if the executive officer of the Office of Public School Construction and the Director of Finance, in consultation with the department, concur that repayment of the disallowed amount over an eight-year period would require the local educational agency to request an emergency apportionment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of, and Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 41325) of, Chapter 3, they may approve a plan of equal annual payments over a period of up to 20 years. The plan shall include interest on each year’s outstanding balance at the rate earned on the state’s Pooled Money Investment Account during that year. The Controller shall withhold the annual amount
 established pursuant to the plan from the local educational agency’s principal apportionment or Education Protection Account payments.

(C) If a payment plan submitted pursuant to this section is not approved by the executive officer of the Office of Public School Construction and the Director of Finance, in consultation with the department, or is not requested by the local educational agency, the executive officer of the Office of Public School Construction shall invoice the local educational agency for the entire disallowed amount. If the local educational agency does not remit payment for the invoice within 120 days of issuance, the executive officer of the Office of Public School Construction shall request that the Controller withhold the entire disallowed amount from the local educational agency’s principal apportionment or Education Protection Account payments.

(D) (i) Funds recovered by the executive officer of the Office of Public School Construction or withheld by the Controller pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the appropriate state school facilities fund, as established in the State Treasury pursuant to Section 17070.40 or 17070.41, as applicable.

(ii) Funds remitted to the Office of Public School Construction by a local educational agency from local fund sources, as authorized by paragraph (3), shall be deposited into the appropriate state school facilities fund, as established in the State Treasury pursuant to Section 17070.40 or 17070.41, as applicable.

(e) As used in this section, “audit or review” and “local educational agency” shall have the same meaning as the terms are defined in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 41344.

(f) The State Allocation Board shall not waive all or any part of this section, any grant agreement or provisions of a grant agreement signed by a local educational agency that receives any funds pursuant to the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1), or any regulation adopted that implements a provision of this section.

(g) In any appeal filed pursuant to Section 41344 and this section, the Office of Public School Construction, the Department of Finance, and the department may timely move to intervene as a party.

(h) If the Office of Public School Construction chooses not to intervene in an appeal, the administrative law judge conducting the hearing, or the Education Audit Appeals Panel, may request that the Office of Public School Construction issue and file in the appeal an
 objective interpretation of any applicable law, regulation, or term of the grant agreement within 30 days of the request or such longer period as the administrative law judge or the Education Audit Appeals Panel deems reasonable. The Office of Public School Construction’s filing shall not argue or seek to resolve issues of fact, but may state how a particular law, regulation, or grant agreement term applies to competing factual contentions. The agent of the Office of Public School Construction shall be precluded from acting as a party once a request pursuant to this subdivision is made.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not apply to any school facilities project that was apportioned before July 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 20.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Foundation Fund [41030. - 41038.]

41030.

Any school district which receives bequests or gifts of money which is surplus money not required for the immediate necessities of the district may invest it pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41031.

Any gift or bequest of money which is to be invested pursuant to this article shall be placed in a district special fund in the county treasury, to be designated as a Foundation Fund. If the gift or bequest of money is required to be used for specific purposes according to the terms of the gift or bequest, the governing board shall place the money in a separate account in the Foundation Fund, and may by resolution designate the separate account by the name that it shall be known, including in its name the term “Foundation Account.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 12.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

41032.

(a) The governing board of any school district may accept on behalf of, and in the name of, the district, gifts, donations, bequests, and devises that are made to the district or to or for the benefit of any school or college administered by the district. The gifts, donations, bequests, and devises may be made subject to conditions or restrictions that the governing board may prescribe.

(b) The money deposited in a separate account in the Foundation Fund shall be invested pursuant to this article or expended only for the purposes of the gift or bequest.

(c) If a gift of land has been accepted by the governing board of a school district upon condition or agreement that it be devoted to school purposes of the district, whether that condition or agreement is written or oral and whether the terms thereof are recited or referred to in any instrument executed in connection with the conveyance of the gift, and the board subsequently determines that the land cannot feasibly be utilized for any school purpose of the district, the board may cause it to be reconveyed to the donor without consideration to the district; provided that failure to do so shall not affect the rights of any bona fide purchaser or encumbrancer of the land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 13.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

41033.

The governing board of a school district which has placed funds in the Foundation Fund is hereby authorized to invest all or any part of those funds as it deems wise and expedient as follows:

(a) In the securities, warrants, or instruments of indebtedness specified by Section 53601 of the Government Code.

(b) In corporate securities other than corporate shares, provided that the amount of investment under this subdivision shall not exceed 50 percent of the amount invested under subdivision (a).

Any security, warrant, or instrument of indebtedness purchased pursuant to this section may be sold and the proceeds reinvested in similar securities, warrants, or instruments, or placed in the Foundation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 14.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

41034.

The governing board of a school district may deposit such securities, warrants, or instruments purchased under Section 41033 for safekeeping pursuant to Section 41016.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41035.

The governing board of a school district that invests money of the Foundation Fund pursuant to this article shall appoint an advisory committee equal in number to the number of members of the governing board. The committee shall be composed of qualified electors of the district and may include members of the governing board. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

41036.

The advisory committee shall advise the governing board as to the investments to be made pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41037.

The governing board shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this article, not inconsistent with law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41038.

Except as may be otherwise provided in this article, other provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to the money placed in the Foundation Fund pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 16.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Miscellaneous Provisions [41050. - 41060.]

41050.

“County” or “counties” includes a city and county as specified in Section 92.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41052.

Whenever the assessed valuation of a school district is reduced as a result of the operation of Section 992 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the school district shall receive replacement revenue from the state for the loss of revenue to the district.

A school district shall be eligible for replacement revenue when the assessed valuation exempted as the result of the operation of Section 992 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is 30 percent or more of the district’s assessed valuation in the 1970–1971 fiscal year. A school district shall be ineligible for replacement revenue when its assessed valuation has increased 250 percent or more over the 1970–1971 fiscal year assessed valuation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41053.

Where a reference is made to “adults” in this division in the context of apportionments to school districts or county superintendents of schools, the reference shall be deemed to refer to persons 21 years of age or over notwithstanding any other provision of law.

Where a reference is made to “minors” in this division in the context of apportionments to school districts or county superintendents of schools, the reference shall be deemed to refer to persons under 21 years of age, notwithstanding Section 6500 of the Family Code or any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41060.

(a) The enactment of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution by the voters of California at the June 6, 1978, primary election severely reduced the property taxing authority of local school districts. The California Legislature has replaced that local property taxing authority with state revenues derived from state taxing authority. It is the intent of the Legislature that local property tax revenues replaced by state funds are to continue to be considered local effort for purposes of federal grants pursuant to Public Law 81-874.

(b) For purposes of computing federal grants pursuant to Public Law 81-874 which requires a local tax effort or maintenance of effort, the fiscal year 1977–78 shall be used as a base year. The percentage of local effort for fiscal year 1977–78 shall be calculated as follows:

(1) The total amount of state and local funds earned by school districts, as determined by Article 2 (commencing with Section 42230) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 as it read prior to repeal by Chapter 282 of the Statutes of 1979 shall be divided into the amount of local tax receipts including tax relief subventions.

(2) The resultant percentage shall be used as the percent of local effort or contribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 37.45.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Determination of Minimum Level of Education Funding [41203. - 41207.]

41203.

Any calculation of the monies to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, shall be made as a single, aggregate calculation for the school districts serving kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, for the community college districts, and for the direct elementary and secondary level instructional services provided by the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 82, Sec. 8.   Effective June 30, 1989.   See same-numbered section in the prevailing Chapter 2 added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

41204.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, pursuant to “The Classroom Instructional Improvement and Accountability Act,” that school districts, as defined in Section 41302.5, and community college districts, as constituted during 1986–87 fiscal year, annually receive a basic minimum portion of the revenues that were deposited to the General Fund in that year.

(b) In recognition of this intent, it is further the intent of the Legislature that both houses and the Governor be guided by the following:

(1) If the revenues of a tax that were deposited in the General Fund in the 1986–87 fiscal year are redirected to any local governmental entity, then the percentages of General Fund revenues required to be applied by the state for the support of school districts, community college districts, and state agencies providing direct elementary and secondary level instructional services shall be recalculated as if those revenues were not deposited in the General Fund in the 1986–87 fiscal year.

(2) If the allocated local proceeds of taxes, as defined by subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 41202, received by a school district or community college district during the 1986–87 fiscal year, are redirected to other entities or statutorily or constitutionally reduced or eliminated, the additional General Fund support provided to replace the allocated local proceeds of taxes may not be counted as General Fund revenues required to be applied for the support of school districts, community college districts, and state agencies providing direct elementary and secondary level instructional services pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, unless the percentage of General Fund revenues appropriated to school districts, community college districts, and state agencies providing direct elementary and secondary level instructional services in the 1986–87 fiscal year is adjusted to reflect the amount of General Fund support that would have been provided in the 1986–87 fiscal year had the allocated local proceeds of taxes been correspondingly reduced.

(c) No appropriation of funding to be allocated to school districts, as defined in Section 41302.5, or community college districts, for the support of any program or activity of either or both of those entities, that is not an ordinary or historical responsibility of one or both of those entities shall be credited toward the state’s funding obligation under subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 82, Sec. 8.   Effective June 30, 1989.   See same-numbered section in the prevailing Chapter 2 added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until July 1, 1990, and as of that date is repealed, unless Senate Constitutional Amendment No. 1 is ratified by the voters at the statewide election to be held on June 5, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 82, Sec. 8.   Effective June 30, 1989.   See same-numbered section in the prevailing Chapter 2 added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 83.   Note: Repeal condition failed; SCA 1 was adopted June 5, 1990, as Prop. 111.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Determination of Minimum Level of Education Funding [41200. - 41211.]

41200.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the John B. Mockler School Finance Act.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the California Constitution, as amended by “The Classroom Instructional Improvement and Accountability Act” as adopted by the voters on November 8, 1988, mandates that a specific
 minimum level of state General Fund revenues be guaranteed and applied for the support of school districts, community college districts, and state agencies that provide direct elementary and secondary level instructional services. The Legislature further finds and declares that, by defining certain terms used in establishing a method of calculation for determining the guaranteed minimum level of funding, Sections 14022.3 and 14022.5 and this chapter further the purposes of “The Classroom Instructional Improvement and Accountability
 Act.”

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the annual Budget Bill, required by Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, include a section that specifies the respective percentages and amounts of General Fund revenues that must be set aside and applied for the support of school districts, community college districts, and the direct elementary and secondary level instructional services of state agencies, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 83, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 3, Sec. 2.   (AB 158)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

41202.

The words and phrases set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the Constitution of the State of California shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Moneys to be applied by the State,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, means appropriations from the General Fund that are made for allocation to school districts, as defined, or community college districts. An appropriation that is withheld, impounded, or made without provisions for its allocation to school districts or community college districts shall not be considered to be “moneys to be applied by the State.”

(b) “General Fund revenues which may be appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as used in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, means General Fund revenues that are the proceeds of taxes as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, including, for the 1986–87 fiscal year only, any revenues that are determined to be in excess of the appropriations limit established pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution for the fiscal year in which they are received. General Fund revenues for a fiscal year to which paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution is being applied shall include, in that computation, only General Fund revenues for that fiscal year that are the proceeds of taxes, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, and shall not include prior fiscal year revenues. Commencing with
 the 1995–96 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, “General Fund revenues that are the proceeds of taxes,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, includes any portion of the proceeds of taxes received from the state sales tax that are transferred to the counties pursuant to, and only if, legislation is enacted during the 1995–96 fiscal year the purpose of which is to realign children’s programs. The amount of the proceeds of taxes shall be computed for any fiscal year in a manner consistent with the manner in which the amount of the proceeds of taxes was computed by the Department of Finance for purposes of the Governor’s Budget for the Budget Act of 1986 (Chapter 186 of the Statutes of 1986).

(c) “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as used in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution,
 means the sum of appropriations made that are for allocation to school districts, as defined in Section 41302.5, regardless of whether those appropriations were made from the General Fund to the Superintendent, to the Controller, or to any other fund or state agency for the purpose of allocation to school districts. The full amount of any appropriation shall be included in the calculation of the percentage required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Article XVI of the California Constitution, without regard to any unexpended balance of any appropriation. Any reappropriation of funds appropriated in any prior year shall not be included in the sum of appropriations.

(d) “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as used in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, means the sum of appropriations made that are for allocation to community college districts, regardless
 of whether those appropriations were made from the General Fund to the Controller, to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or to any other fund or state agency for the purpose of allocation to community college districts. The full amount of any appropriation shall be included in the calculation of the percentage required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Article XVI of the California Constitution, without regard to any unexpended balance of any appropriation. Any reappropriation of funds appropriated in any prior year shall not be included in the sum of appropriations.

(e) “Total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as used in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, means the sum of appropriations made that are for allocation to school
 districts, as defined in Section 41302.5, and community college districts, regardless of whether those appropriations were made from the General Fund to the Controller, to the Superintendent, to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or to any other fund or state agency for the purpose of allocation to school districts and community college districts. The full amount of any appropriation shall be included in the calculation of the percentage required by paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, without regard to any unexpended balance of any appropriation. Any reappropriation of funds appropriated in any prior year shall not be included in the sum of appropriations.

(f) “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts and community college districts, respectively” and “moneys to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college
 districts,” as used in Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, shall include funds appropriated to local educational agencies, as defined in Section 8208, for part-day California state preschool programs under Article 7 (commencing with Section 8235) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1, funds appropriated to local educational agencies, as defined in Section 8208, to create a full day of care for children participating in the California state preschool program, and funds appropriated for the After School Education and Safety Program established pursuant to Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1, and shall not include any of the following:

(1) Any appropriation that is not made for allocation to a school district, as defined in Section 41302.5, or to a community college district, regardless of whether the appropriation is made for any purpose that may be considered